District of Columbia statutes.
7-1831.06

Termination.

This subchapter shall expire on September 30, 2001, if the Bonds (other than the Residual Bond) are not sold and issued. In the event of such expiration, all the assets of the Corporation shall vest in the District.

History

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 3707, 47 DCR 6308

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see notes following § 7-1831.01.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 3702 to 3707 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).